Utah statutes.
53A-1a-1002.   Pilot project to develop school readiness skills of preschool
children.
(1)  UPSTART, a pilot project that uses a home-based educational technology
program to develop school readiness skills of preschool children, is
established within the public education system.
(2)  UPSTART is created to:
(a)  evaluate the effectiveness of giving preschool children access, at home,
to interactive individualized instruction delivered by computers and the
Internet to prepare them academically for success in school; and
(b)  test the feasibility of scaling a home-based curriculum in reading, math,
and science delivered by computers and the Internet to all preschool children
in Utah.
(3)  The State Board of Education shall contract with an educational
technology provider, selected through a request for proposals process, for the
delivery of a home-based educational technology program for preschool children
that meets the requirements of Subsection (4).
(4)  A home-based educational technology program for preschool children shall
meet the following standards:
(a)  the contractor shall provide computer-assisted instruction for preschool
children on a home computer connected by the Internet to a centralized file
storage facility;
(b)  the contractor shall:
(i)  provide technical support to families for the installation and operation
of the instructional software; and
(ii)  provide for the installation of computer and Internet access in homes of
low income families that cannot afford the equipment and service;
(c)  the contractor shall have the capability of doing the following through
the Internet:
(i)  communicating with parents;
(ii)  updating the instructional software;
(iii)  validating user access;
(iv)  collecting usage data;
(v)  storing research data; and
(vi)  producing reports for parents, schools, and the Legislature;
(d)  the program shall include the following components:
(i)  computer-assisted, individualized instruction in reading, mathematics,
and science;
(ii)  a multisensory reading tutoring program; and
(iii)  a validated computer adaptive reading test that does not require the
presence of trained adults to administer and is an accurate indicator of
reading readiness of children who cannot read;
(e)  the contractor shall have the capability to quickly and efficiently
modify, improve, and support the product;
(f)  the contractor shall work in cooperation with school district personnel
who will provide administrative and technical support of the program as
provided in Section 53A-1a-1003;
(g)  the contractor shall solicit families to participate in the program as
provided in Section 53A-1a-1004; and
(h)  in implementing the home-based educational technology program, the
contractor shall seek the advise and expertise of early childhood education
professionals within the Utah System of Higher Education on issues such as:
(i)  soliciting families to participate in the program;
(ii)  providing training to families; and
(iii)  motivating families to regularly use the instructional software.
(5)  The contract shall provide funding for a home-based educational
technology program for preschool children for one year with an option to
extend the contract for additional years or to expand the program to a greater
number of preschool children, subject to the appropriation of money by the
Legislature for UPSTART.
